Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.420

Graduate scholarships for engineering research—Established.

In order to further the development of advance studies in engineering there shall be established in the engineering laboratories of the University of Washington, ten graduate scholarships and/or fellowships to the amount of one thousand dollars and tuition each, per academic year. These scholarships shall be in the field of engineering which can best be used to aid the industrial development of the state of Washington and its resources. This graduate work shall be done in the laboratories of the university and shall be directed along the lines of professional research and testing.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.420. Prior: 1945 c 241 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.77.220.]